District of Columbia statutes.
2-360.07

Actions in court; judicial review of Board decisions.

In the event of an appeal by a contractor or the CPO from a decision of the Board pursuant to § 2-360.05, notwithstanding any contract provision, rule, or rule of law to the contrary, the decision of the Board on questions of fact shall be final and conclusive and shall not be set aside unless the decision is fraudulent, arbitrary, capricious, or so grossly erroneous as to necessarily imply bad faith, or if the decision is not supported by substantial evidence.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1007, 58 DCR 1185
2001 Ed., § 2-309.07.